Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-27,154
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that are necessary for the administration of the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act. Such rules and regulations shall not abridge the authority of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control exists within the meaning of the act.

Laws 1972, LB 716, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 308, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 46;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 100;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 393.